Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1150.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 712.1(a) and (e) of Title 65 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 712.1. Notification of agency business required and exceptions.(a) Official action.--Except as provided in subsection (b), (c)[,] or (d) [or (e)], an agency may not take official action on a matter of agency business at a meeting if the matter was not included in the notification required under section 709(c.1) (relating to public notice).* * *(e) Changes to agenda.--[(1) Upon majority vote of the individuals present and voting during the conduct of a meeting, an agency may add a 123456789101112131415161718 matter of agency business to the agenda. The reasons for the changes to the agenda shall be announced at the meeting before any vote is conducted to make the changes to the agenda. The agency may subsequently take official action on the matter added to the agenda. The agency shall post the amended agenda on the agency's publicly accessible Internet website, if available, and at the agency's principal office location no later than the first business day following the meeting at which the agenda was changed.(2) This subsection shall not apply to a conference or a working session under section 707 (relating to exceptions to open meetings) or an executive session under section 708 (relating to executive sessions).](1) During the conduct of a meeting, an agency may add a matter of agency business arising under subsection (b), (c) or (d) to the agenda if:(i) A majority of the individuals present and voting approve the addition.(ii) The reason for the change to the agenda is announced at the meeting before any vote is conducted to make the change to the agenda.(2) After a vote under paragraph (1), the agency:(i) May subsequently take official action on the matter added to the agenda arising under subsection (b), (c) or (d).(ii) Shall post the amended agenda no later than the first business day following the meeting at which the agenda was changed in the following places:(A) The agency's publicly accessible Internet website, if available.20260SB1150PN1399 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) The agency's principal office location.(3) This subsection shall not apply to a conference or a working session under section 707 (relating to exceptions to open meetings) or an executive session under section 708 (relating to executive sessions).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1150PN1399 - 3 - 1234567